District of Columbia statutes.
7-2271.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Agency” means the Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency.

(2)

“Commission” means the Homeland Security Commission established by § 7-2271.02.

(3)

“Director” means the Director of the Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 201, 54 DCR 794